test/src/gt-norm-yamls/VAI_VINIT_INDEP_aakozi_gt-norm.yaml
     Px1+aakozi+Neg+1Pl+Dub+3Pl: niaakozisiimindigag
     Px1+aakozi+Neg+1Pl+Pret+3Obv: niaakozisiiminbanan
     Px1+aakozi+Neg+1Pl+Pret+3Pl: niaakozisiiminbanag
     Px1+aakozi+Neg+1Pl+PretDub+3Obv: niaakozisiimingobanan
     Px1+aakozi+Neg+1Pl+PretDub+3Pl: niaakozisiimingobanag
     Px1+aakozi+Neg+2Pl+Dub+3Obv: niaakozisiimdigan
     Px1+aakozi+Neg+2Pl+Dub+3Pl: niaakozisiimdigag
     Px1+aakozi+Neg+2Pl+Pret+3Obv: niaakozisiimbanan
     Px1+aakozi+Neg+2Pl+Pret+3Pl: niaakozisiimbanag
     Px1+aakozi+Neg+2Pl+PretDub+3Obv: niaakozisiimgobanan
     Px1+aakozi+Neg+2Pl+PretDub+3Pl: niaakozisiimgobanag
     Px1+aakozi+Neg+Px3+Dub+3Obv: niaakozisiiwdigan
     Px1+aakozi+Neg+Px3+Dub+3Pl: niaakozisiiwdigag
     Px1+aakozi+Neg+Px3+Pret+3Obv: niaakozisiiwbanan
     Px1+aakozi+Neg+Px3+Pret+3Pl: niaakozisiiwbanag
     Px1+aakozi+Neg+Px3+PretDub+3Obv: niaakozisiiwgobanan
     Px1+aakozi+Neg+Px3+PretDub+3Pl: niaakozisiiwgobanag
     Px2+aakozi+Neg+1Pl+Dub+3Obv: giaakozisiimindigan
     Px2+aakozi+Neg+1Pl+Dub+3Pl: giaakozisiimindigag
     Px2+aakozi+Neg+1Pl+Pret+3Obv: giaakozisiiminbanan
     Px2+aakozi+Neg+1Pl+Pret+3Pl: giaakozisiiminbanag
     Px2+aakozi+Neg+1Pl+PretDub+3Obv: giaakozisiimingobanan
     Px2+aakozi+Neg+1Pl+PretDub+3Pl: giaakozisiimingobanag
     Px2+aakozi+Neg+2Pl+Dub+3Obv: giaakozisiimdigan
     Px2+aakozi+Neg+2Pl+Dub+3Pl: giaakozisiimdigag
     Px2+aakozi+Neg+2Pl+Pret+3Obv: giaakozisiimbanan
     Px2+aakozi+Neg+2Pl+Pret+3Pl: giaakozisiimbanag
     Px2+aakozi+Neg+2Pl+PretDub+3Obv: giaakozisiimgobanan
     Px2+aakozi+Neg+2Pl+PretDub+3Pl: giaakozisiimgobanag
     Px2+aakozi+Neg+Px3+Dub+3Obv: giaakozisiiwdigan
     Px2+aakozi+Neg+Px3+Dub+3Pl: giaakozisiiwdigag
     Px2+aakozi+Neg+Px3+Pret+3Obv: giaakozisiiwbanan
     Px2+aakozi+Neg+Px3+Pret+3Pl: giaakozisiiwbanag
     Px2+aakozi+Neg+Px3+PretDub+3Obv: giaakozisiiwgobanan
     Px2+aakozi+Neg+Px3+PretDub+3Pl: giaakozisiiwgobanag
     
